California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 157, Sec. 2.   (SB 699)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

16601.

Any person who sells the goodwill of a business, or any owner of a business entity selling or otherwise disposing of all of his or her ownership interest in the business entity, or any owner of a business entity that sells (a) all or substantially all of its operating assets together with the goodwill of the business entity, (b) all or substantially all of the operating assets of a division or a subsidiary of the business entity together with the goodwill of that division or subsidiary, or (c) all of the ownership interest of any subsidiary, may agree with the buyer to refrain from carrying on a similar business within a specified geographic area in which the business so sold, or that of the business entity, division, or subsidiary has been carried on, so long as the buyer, or any person deriving title to the goodwill or ownership interest from the buyer, carries on a like business therein.

For the purposes of this section, “business entity” means any partnership (including a limited partnership or a limited liability partnership), limited liability company (including a series of a limited liability company formed under the laws of a jurisdiction that recognizes such a series), or corporation.

For the purposes of this section, “owner of a business entity” means any partner, in the case of a business entity that is a partnership (including a limited partnership or a limited liability partnership), or any member, in the case of a business entity that is a limited liability company (including a series of a limited liability company formed under the laws of a jurisdiction that recognizes such a series), or any owner of capital stock, in the case of a business entity that is a corporation.

For the purposes of this section, “ownership interest” means a partnership interest, in the case of a business entity that is a partnership (including a limited partnership a limited liability partnership), a membership interest, in the case of a business entity that is a limited liability company (including a series of a limited liability company formed under the laws of a jurisdiction that recognizes such a series), or a capital stockholder, in the case of a business entity that is a corporation.

For the purposes of this section, “subsidiary” means any business entity over which the selling business entity has voting control or from which the selling business entity has a right to receive a majority share of distributions upon dissolution or other liquidation of the business entity (or has both voting control and a right to receive these distributions.)

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 495, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

16602.

(a) Any partner may, upon or in anticipation of any of the circumstances described in subdivision (b), agree that he or she will not carry on a similar business within a specified geographic area where the partnership business has been transacted, so long as any other member of the partnership, or any person deriving title to the business or its goodwill from any such other member of the partnership, carries on a like business therein.

(b) Subdivision (a) applies to either of the following circumstances:

(1) A dissolution of the partnership.

(2) Dissociation of the partner from the partnership.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 179, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

16602.5.

Any member may, upon or in anticipation of a dissolution of, or the termination of his or her interest in, a limited liability company (including a series of a limited liability company formed under the laws of a jurisdiction recognizing such a series), agree that he or she or it will not carry on a similar business within a specified geographic area where the limited liability company business has been transacted, so long as any other member of the limited liability company, or any person deriving title to the business or its goodwill from any such other member of the limited liability company, carries on a like business therein.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 495, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

16603.

Every person who, as a condition to a sale or consignment of any magazine, book, or other publication requires that the purchaser or consignee purchase or receive for sale any horror comic book, is guilty of a misdemeanor, punishable by imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding six months, or by fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both.

This section is not intended to prohibit an agreement requiring a person to purchase or accept on consignment a minimum number of copies of a single edition or issue of a magazine or of a particular book or other particular publication. 

As used in this section “person” includes a corporation, partnership, or other association.

As used in this section “horror comic book” means any book or booklet in which an account of the commission or attempted commission of the crime of arson, assault with caustic chemicals, assault with a deadly weapon, burglary, kidnapping, mayhem, murder, rape, robbery, theft, or voluntary manslaughter is set forth by means of a series of five or more drawings or photographs in sequence, which are accompanied by either narrative writing or words represented as spoken by a pictured character, whether such narrative words appear in balloons, captions or on or immediately adjacent to the photograph or drawing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1092, Sec. 49.   Effective September 27, 1983.   Operative January 1, 1984, by Sec. 427 of Ch. 1092.)
-------------------------------------------

16604.

Every person who, as a condition to a sale or consignment of any magazine, book, or other publication, requires that the purchaser or consignee purchase or receive for sale any other magazine, book, or other publication is guilty of a misdemeanor, punishable by imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding six months, or by fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both such imprisonment and such fine.

This section is not intended to prohibit an agreement requiring a person to purchase or accept on consignment a minimum number of copies of a single edition or issue of a magazine or of a particular book or other particular publication. 

As used in this section, “person” includes a corporation, partnership, or other association.

This section does not apply with respect to any contract relating exclusively to the sale or consignment of any newspaper of general circulation as defined by Section 6000 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1092, Sec. 50.   Effective September 27, 1983.   Operative January 1, 1984, by Sec. 427 of Ch. 1092.)
-------------------------------------------

16605.

Every person engaged in the business of distribution of books, magazines or publications of any kind to retail dealers shall remove from the possession of a retail dealer, within 10 days after notification by the dealer, any material which he delivered to the dealer which the dealer did not specifically request, if such dealer notifies such person that he does not want the material within 48 hours of receipt of the material.

Any person who refuses to transact business with a dealer because of any action taken by the dealer under this section is guilty of a misdemeanor.

As used in this section “person” includes a corporation, partnership or other association.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1723.)
-------------------------------------------

16606.

The customer list, including the names, addresses, and identity of customers, of a telephone answering service shall constitute a trade secret and confidential information of, and shall belong to, the owner of the telephone answering service.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 720.)
-------------------------------------------

16607.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), the customer list, including the names, addresses and identity of all employer customers who have listed job orders with an employment agency within a period of 180 days prior to the separation of an employee from the agency and including the names, addresses and identity of all applicant customers of the employment agency, shall constitute a trade secret and confidential information of, and shall belong to, the employment agency.

(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (a), no liability shall attach to, and no cause of action shall arise from, the use of a customer list of an employment agency by a former employee who enters into business as an employment agency more than one year immediately following termination of his employment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1116.)
-------------------------------------------

16608.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Contract” includes a promise, undertaking, contract, or agreement, whether written or oral, express or implied.

(2) “Debt” means money, personal property, or their equivalent that is due or owing or alleged to be due or owing from a natural person to another person, including, but not limited to, for employment-related costs, education-related costs, or a consumer financial product or service, regardless of whether the debt is certain, contingent, or incurred voluntarily.

(3) “Debt collector” has the same meaning as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 1788.2 of the Civil Code.

(4) “Employer” means any person or entity that employs workers. “Employer” includes any parent company, subsidiary, division, affiliate, contractor, hiring party, or third-party agent of an employer.

(5) “Freelance worker” has the same meaning as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 18101.

(6) “Misconduct” has the same meaning as in Section 1256 of the Unemployment Insurance Code.

(7) “Penalty, fee, or cost” includes, but is not limited to, a replacement hire fee, retraining fee, replacement fee, quit fee, reimbursement for immigration or visa-related costs, liquidated damages, lost goodwill, and lost profit.

(8) “Person” means a natural person or an entity, including, but not limited to, a corporation, partnership, association, trust, limited liability company, cooperative, or other organization.

(9) “Training provider” means an entity, whether or not affiliated with an employer, that provides an educational program, as defined in Section 94837 of the Education Code, a job training program, or a skills training program.

(10) “Transferable credential” means a degree that is offered by a third-party institution that is accredited and authorized to operate in the state, is not required for a worker’s current employment, and is transferable and useful for employment beyond the worker’s current employer.

(11) “Worker” means a natural person who is permitted to work for or on behalf of an employer or business entity, or who is permitted to participate in any other work relationship, job training program, or skills training program. “Worker” includes, but is not limited to, an employee or prospective employee.

(b) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), for contracts entered into on or after January 1, 2027, it shall be unlawful to include in any employment contract, or to require a worker to execute as a condition of employment or a work relationship a contract that includes, a contract term that does any of the following:

(A) Requires the worker to pay an employer, training provider, or debt collector for a debt if the worker’s employment or work relationship with a specific employer terminates.

(B) Authorizes the employer, training provider, or debt collector to resume or initiate collection of or end forbearance on a debt if the worker’s employment or work relationship with a specific employer terminates.

(C) Imposes any penalty, fee, or cost on a worker if the worker’s employment or work relationship with a specific employer terminates.

(2) This section does not apply to any of the following:

(A) (i) A contract entered into under any loan repayment assistance program or loan forgiveness program provided by a federal, state, or local governmental agency.

(ii) A contract entered into pursuant to a recruitment and retention program funded by a federal, state, or local government agency grant that offers recruitment or retention bonuses, if the employee repayment obligations comply with the requirements of the grant and do not exceed the service obligations required by the grant.

(B) A contract related to the repayment of the cost of tuition for a transferable credential that meets all of the following requirements:

(i) The contract is offered separately from any contract for employment.

(ii) The contract does not require obtaining the transferable credential as a condition of employment.

(iii) The contract specifies the repayment amount before the worker agrees to the contract, and the repayment amount does not exceed the cost to the employer of the transferable credential received by the worker.

(iv) The contract provides for a prorated repayment amount during any required employment period that is proportional to the total repayment amount and the length of the required employment period and does not require an accelerated payment schedule if the worker separates from the employment.

(v) The contract does not require repayment to the employer by the worker if the worker is terminated, except if the worker is terminated for misconduct.

(C) A contract related to enrollment in an apprenticeship program approved by the Division of Apprenticeship Standards.

(D) A contract for the receipt of a discretionary or unearned monetary payment, including a financial bonus, that is not tied to specific job performance, provided that all of the following conditions are met:

(i) The terms of any repayment obligation are set forth in a separate agreement from the primary employment contract.

(ii) The employee is notified that they have the right to consult an attorney regarding the agreement and provided with a reasonable time period of not less than five business days to obtain advice of counsel prior to executing the agreement.

(iii) Any repayment obligation for early separation from employment is not subject to interest accrual and is prorated based on the remaining term of any retention period, which shall not exceed two years from the receipt of payment.

(iv) The worker has an option to defer receipt of the payment to the end of a fully served retention period without any repayment obligation.

(v) Separation from employment prior to the retention period was at the sole election of the employee, or at the election of the employer for misconduct.

(E) A contract related to the lease, financing, or purchase of residential property, including, but not limited to, a contract pursuant to the California Residential Mortgage Lending Act (Division 20 (commencing with Section 50000) of the Financial Code).

(F) A contract for the receipt of a discretionary or unearned monetary payment from the employer that is an inducement for the worker to be affiliated with the employer or agreeing to maintain a relationship with the employer, provided that all of the following conditions are met:

(i) The terms of any repayment obligation are set forth in a separate agreement from the primary employment contract.

(ii) The payment from the employer to the worker is in addition to compensation that would otherwise be payable to the worker in connection with their employment.

(iii) The worker is notified that they have the right to consult an attorney regarding the agreement and be provided with a reasonable time period of not less than five business days to obtain advice of counsel prior to executing the agreement.

(iv) If an outstanding repayment obligation continues following separation from employment and interest accrues on the obligation after separation, the applicable interest rate shall not exceed the applicable federal rate published by the Internal Revenue Service for federal income tax purposes.

(v) The contract is between a securities broker-dealer, insurance producer, or investment adviser, including their affiliates, and its agents or representatives that are any of the following:

(I) Registered with the United States Securities and Exchange Commission or the Financial Industry Regulatory Authority.

(II) Licensed by the State of California under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 25210) or Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 25230) of Part 3 of Division 1 of Title 4 of the Corporations Code.

(III) Licensed by the State of California under Section 1626 of the Insurance Code. 

(G) A repayment obligation arising from voluntary separation of employment related to an advanced payment made by the employer for paid time off in excess of a worker’s accrued paid time off, provided that all of the following conditions are met:

(i) The terms of any repayment obligation are clearly disclosed to the worker separate from the primary employment contract upon the worker’s request to receive advanced payment for paid time off in excess of a worker’s accrued paid time off.

(ii) The repayment obligation does not exceed 40 hours accrued paid time off.

(iii) The repayment obligation is not subject to interest accrual.

(c) (1) A contract that is unlawful under subdivision (b) is a contract restraining a person from engaging in a lawful profession, trade, or business, and is void under Section 16600 only if the contract was entered into on or after January 1, 2027.

(2) The provisions of this section, as they existed on January 1, 2026, shall be inoperative from January 1, 2026, to December 31, 2026, inclusive.

(d) The rights, remedies, and penalties established by this section are cumulative and shall not be construed to supersede or limit the rights, remedies, or penalties established under other laws, or to limit the ability of any other person or entity to pursue enforcement of rights, remedies, or penalties established under other laws, including, but not limited to:

(1) Obligations of employers under Section 2802 of the Labor Code.

(2) Article 1.5 (commencing with Section 2775) of Chapter 2 of Division 3 of the Labor Code.

(3) The Unfair Competition Law (Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 17200)).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 889, Sec. 2.   (AB 1697)   Effective September 30, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Combinations in Restraint of Trade [16700. - 16770.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [16700. - 16703.]

16700.

The provisions of this chapter are cumulative of each other and of any other provision of law relating to the same subject in effect May 22, 1907.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 526.)
-------------------------------------------

16701.

Section 24 of this code shall not determine the separability of the provisions of this chapter, one from another. Such separability shall be determined by whether the provisions of Chapter 530 of the Statutes of 1907 and the provisions of Chapter 362 of the Statutes of 1909 are separable among themselves and as to each other.

If the words “or reduce” (following the word “increase”) were not effectively deleted from Subdivision 2 of Section 1 of Chapter 530 of the Statutes of 1907 by Section 1 of Chapter 362 of the Statutes of 1909, a combination of capital, skill or acts by two or more persons for the purpose of reducing the price of merchandise or of any commodity is a trust.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 526.)
-------------------------------------------

16702.

As used in this chapter “person” or “persons” includes corporations, firms, partnerships and associations existing under or authorized by the laws of this State or any other State, or any foreign country.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 526.)
-------------------------------------------

16703.

Within the meaning of this chapter, labor, whether skilled or unskilled, is not a commodity.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 526.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Prohibited Restraints on Competition [16720. - 16729.]

16720.

A trust is a combination of capital, skill or acts by two or more persons for any of the following purposes:

(a) To create or carry out restrictions in trade or commerce.

(b) To limit or reduce the production, or increase the price of merchandise or of any commodity.

(c) To prevent competition in manufacturing, making, transportation, sale or purchase of merchandise, produce or any commodity.

(d) To fix at any standard or
 figure, whereby its price to the public or consumer shall be in any manner controlled or established, any article or commodity of merchandise, produce or commerce intended for sale, barter, use or consumption in this State.

(e) To make or enter into or execute or carry out any contracts, obligations or agreements of any kind or description, by which they do all or any or any combination of any of the following:

(1) Bind themselves not to sell, dispose of or transport any article or any commodity or any article of trade, use, merchandise, commerce or consumption below a common standard figure, or fixed value.

(2) Agree in any manner to keep the price of such article, commodity or transportation at a fixed or graduated figure.

(3) Establish or settle the
 price of any article, commodity or transportation between them or themselves and others, so as directly or indirectly to preclude a free and unrestricted competition among themselves, or any purchasers or consumers in the sale or transportation of any such article or commodity.

(4) Agree to pool, combine or directly or indirectly unite any interests that they may have connected with the sale or transportation of any such article or commodity, that its price might in any manner be affected.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 526.)
-------------------------------------------

16721.

Recognizing that the California Constitution prohibits a person from being disqualified from entering or pursuing a business, profession, vocation, or employment because of sex, race, creed, color, or national or ethnic origin, and guarantees the free exercise and enjoyment of religion without discrimination or preference; and recognizing that these and other basic, fundamental constitutional principles are directly affected and denigrated by certain ongoing practices in the business and commercial world, it is necessary that provisions protecting and enhancing a
 person’s right to enter or pursue business and to freely exercise and enjoy religion, consistent with law, be established.

(a) No person within the jurisdiction of this state shall be excluded from a business transaction on the basis of a policy expressed in any document or writing and imposed by a third party where that policy requires discrimination against that person on the basis of any characteristic listed or defined in subdivision (b) or (e) of Section 51 of the Civil Code or on the basis that the person conducts or has conducted business in a particular location.

(b) No person within the jurisdiction of this state shall require another person to be excluded, or be required to exclude another person, from a business transaction on the basis of a policy expressed in any document or writing that requires discrimination against that other person on the basis of any
 characteristic listed or defined in subdivision (b) or (e) of Section 51 of the Civil Code or on the basis that the person conducts or has conducted business in a particular location.

(c) Any violation of any provision of this section is a conspiracy against trade.

(d) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit any person, on this basis of his or her individual ideology or preferences, from doing business or refusing to do business with any other person consistent with law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 568, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

16721.5.

(a) It is an unlawful trust and an unlawful restraint of trade for a person to do the following:

(1) Grant or accept a letter of credit, or other document that evidences the transfer of funds or credit, or enter into a contract for the exchange of goods or services, if the letter of credit, contract, or other document contains a provision that requires a person to discriminate against, or to certify that he, she, or it has not dealt with, another person on the basis of any
 characteristic listed or defined in subdivision (b) or (e) of Section 51 of the Civil Code, or on the basis of a person’s lawful business associations.

(2) To refuse to grant or accept a letter of credit, or other document that evidences the transfer of funds or credit, or to refuse to enter into a contract for the exchange of goods or services, on the ground that the letter, contract, or document does not contain a discriminatory provision or certification.

(b) This section shall not apply to a letter of credit, contract, or other document that contains a provision pertaining to a labor dispute or an unfair labor practice if the other provisions of that letter of credit, contract, or other document otherwise do not violate this section.

(c) For purposes of this section, the prohibition against discrimination on the
 basis of a person’s business associations does not include the requiring of association with particular employment or a particular group as a prerequisite to obtaining group rates or discounts on insurance, recreational activities, or other similar benefits.

(d) For purposes of this section, “person” shall include, but not be limited to, individuals, firms, partnerships, associations, corporations, and governmental agencies.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 179, Sec. 22.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

16721.6.

It is the intent of the Legislature that Sections 16721 and 16721.5 be interpreted and applied so as not to conflict with federal law with respect to transactions in the interstate or foreign commerce of the United States to the extent, if any, not preempted by the Export Administration Act of 1969 as amended (50 U.S.C.App. Sec. 2401 and following) and any regulations promulgated thereunder.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 859.)
-------------------------------------------

16722.

Any contract or agreement in violation of this chapter is absolutely void and is not enforceable at law or in equity.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 526.)
-------------------------------------------

16725.

It is not unlawful to enter into agreements or form associations or combinations, the purpose and effect of which is to promote, encourage or increase competition in any trade or industry, or which are in furtherance of trade.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 526.)
-------------------------------------------

16726.

Except as provided in this chapter, every trust is unlawful, against public policy and void.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 526.)
-------------------------------------------

16727.

It shall be unlawful for any person to lease or make a sale or contract for the sale of goods, merchandise, machinery, supplies, commodities for use within the State, or to fix a price charged therefor, or discount from, or rebate upon, such price, on the condition, agreement or understanding that the lessee or purchaser thereof shall not use or deal in the goods, merchandise, machinery, supplies, commodities, or services of a competitor or competitors of the lessor or seller, where the effect of such lease, sale, or contract for sale or such condition, agreement or understanding may be to substantially lessen competition or tend to create a monopoly in any line of trade or
 commerce in any section of the State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 738.)
-------------------------------------------

16728.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, motor carriers of property, as defined in Section 34601 of the Vehicle Code, may voluntarily elect to participate in uniform cargo liability rules, uniform bills of lading or receipts for property being transported, uniform cargo credit rules, joint line rates or routes, classifications, mileage guides, and pooling. Motor carriers of property that so elect shall comply with all requirements of Section 14501(c) of Title 49 of the United States Code and with federal regulations promulgated pursuant
 to that section. The Legislature intends by this section to provide to motor carriers of property the antitrust immunity authorized by state action pursuant to Section 14501(c) of Title 49 of the United States Code.

(b) The election authorized by this section shall be exercised in either of the following ways:

(1) Participation in an agreement pursuant to Section 13703 of Title 49 of the United States Code.

(2) Filing with the Department of Motor Vehicles a notice of adoption of any or all of the uniform cargo liability rules, uniform bills of lading or receipts for property being transported, uniform cargo credit rules, joint rates or routes, classifications, mileage guides, and pooling contained in an identified publication authorized by Section 13703 of Title 49 of the United States Code, along with a written
 certification issued by the organization establishing those uniform rules or provisions in accordance with Section 13703(g)(1)(B) of Title 49 of the United States Code, affirming participation of the motor carrier of property in the collective publication. The certification shall be made available for public inspection.

(c) The elections made by a motor carrier of property pursuant to this section may be canceled by the motor carrier.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 829, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

16729.

(a) It shall be unlawful for a person to use or distribute a common pricing algorithm as part of a contract, combination in the form of a trust, or conspiracy to restrain trade or commerce in violation of this chapter.

(b) It shall be unlawful for a person to use or distribute a common pricing algorithm if the person coerces another person to set or adopt a recommended price or commercial term recommended by the common pricing algorithm for the same or similar products or services in the jurisdiction of this state.

(c) Nothing in this section shall impair or limit the applicability of antitrust laws.

(d) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Antitrust laws” means the provisions of this part.

(2) “Commercial term” includes, without limitation, any of the following:

(A) Level of service.

(B) Availability.

(C) Output, including quantities of products produced or distributed or the amount or level of service provided.

(3) “Common pricing algorithm” means any
 methodology, including a computer, software, or other technology, used by two or more persons, that uses competitor data to recommend, align, stabilize, set, or otherwise influence a price or commercial
 term.

(4) “Distribute,” “distribution,” and “distributing” include selling, licensing, providing access to, or otherwise making available by any means, including through a subscription or the sale of a service.

(5) “Person” has the same meaning as defined in Section 16702 and does not include the end consumer of a product or service. 

(6) “Price” means the amount of money or other thing of value, whether tangible or not, expected, required, or given in payment for any product or service, including compensation paid to an employee or independent contractor for services provided.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 338, Sec. 1.   (AB 325)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Enforcement [16750. - 16762.]

16750.

(a) Any person who is injured in his or her business or property by reason of anything forbidden or declared unlawful by this chapter, may sue therefor in any court having jurisdiction in the county where the defendant resides or is found, or any agent resides or is found, or where service may be obtained, without respect to the amount in controversy, and to recover three times the damages sustained by him or her, interest on his or her actual damages pursuant to Section 16761, and preliminary or permanent injunctive relief when and under the same conditions and principles as injunctive relief is granted by courts generally under the laws of this state and the rules governing these proceedings, and shall be awarded a reasonable attorneys’ fee together with the costs of the suit.

This action may be brought by any person who is injured in his or her business or property by reason of anything forbidden or declared unlawful by this chapter, regardless of whether such injured person dealt directly or indirectly with the defendant.

The amendments to this section adopted at the 1959 Regular Session of the Legislature do not apply to any action commenced prior to September 18, 1959.

(b) The state and any of its political subdivisions and public agencies shall be deemed a person within the meaning of this section.

(c) The Attorney General may bring an action on behalf of the state or of any of its political subdivisions or public agencies to recover the damages provided for by this section, or by any comparable provision of federal law, provided that the Attorney General shall notify in writing any political subdivision or public agency of his or her intention to bring any such action on its behalf, and at any time within 30 days thereafter, such political subdivision or public agency may, by formal resolution of its governing body or as otherwise specifically provided by applicable law, withdraw the authority of the Attorney General to bring the intended action. In any action brought pursuant to this section on behalf of any political subdivision or public agency of the state, the state shall retain for deposit in the Attorney General antitrust account within the General Fund, out of the proceeds, if any, resulting from such action, an amount equal to the expense incurred by the Attorney General in the investigation and prosecution of such action or an amount equal to 10 percent of the total recovery obtained by the Attorney General, whichever is greater.

(d) In any antitrust action brought on behalf of the state in which the Attorney General is the class representative of political subdivisions, public agencies, or citizens of the state who have been affected by the matters set forth in the complaint, the state shall retain for deposit in the Attorney General antitrust account within the General Fund, the proceeds, if any, of any attorneys’ fees awarded by the court in which such case is located, to the Attorney General, resulting from such class representation.

(e) In any action brought by the Attorney General pursuant to either state or federal antitrust laws for the recovery of damages by the state or any of its political subdivisions or public agencies, in addition to his or her other powers and authority, the Attorney General may enter into contracts relating to the investigation and the prosecution of such action with any other party plaintiff who has brought a similar action for the recovery of damages and with whom the Attorney General finds it advantageous to act jointly, or to share common expenses or to cooperate in any manner relative to such action. In any such action, notwithstanding the provisions of Section 12520 of the Government Code, the Attorney General may undertake, among other things, either to render legal services as special counsel to, or to obtain the legal services of special counsel from any department or agency of the United States, of this state or any other state or any department or agency thereof, any county, city, public corporation or public district of this state or of any other state, that has brought or intends to bring a similar action for the recovery of damages, or their duly authorized legal representatives in such action. The Attorney General may also enter into any agreement authorized by Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 6500) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code with any governmental entity enumerated in this subdivision, notwithstanding any provision to the contrary contained in Section 6500 of the Government Code. Every contract or agreement entered into pursuant to this subdivision (e) shall be approved by the Department of General Services.

(f) The amounts paid into the Attorney General antitrust account within the General Fund pursuant to subdivisions (c), (d) and (e) arising from the same action or companion actions shall not cumulatively exceed the greater of ten percent (10%) of the total recovery in all actions resulting from the Attorney General’s representation or an amount equal to the expenses incurred by the Attorney General in the investigation and prosecution of such actions. Any excess shall be paid into the General Fund.

(g) The district attorney of any county may prosecute any action on behalf of such county or any city or public agency or political subdivision located wholly within such county which the Attorney General is authorized to bring pursuant to subdivision (c) of this section, whenever it appears that the activities giving rise to such prosecution or the effects of such activities occur primarily within such county. The district attorney shall file with the Attorney General at least 30 days prior to the filing of any such action a copy of the proposed complaint together with a confidential memorandum and report explaining the facts giving rise to the proposed prosecution and supporting the filing of the new complaint. Prior to entering into any stipulated or consent judgment or other settlement of any such action, the district attorney shall file with the Attorney General at least 30 days prior to the execution thereof a copy of the proposed settlement together with a memorandum of explanation of the settlement. The Attorney General may waive any time requirements provided in this subdivision. In any investigation or action undertaken or brought by a district attorney pursuant to this section, if the Attorney General deems it necessary and in the public interest, the Attorney General may take full charge of any such investigation or prosecution, and the Attorney General shall have all the powers granted by Section 12550 of the Government Code in respect thereto.

(h) In any action prosecuted pursuant to the provisions of subdivision (g) a district attorney may exercise all of the powers conferred on the Attorney General by subdivision (e) provided that every contract or agreement entered into pursuant to this subdivision by a district attorney shall first be approved by the governing authority of the agency in his or her county.
